Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-126
Governor; recommendations as to deficiency funding; bill form.

(1) The Governor shall present to each regular session of the Legislature his or her recommendations as to such deficiency funding requirements as he or she deems necessary for the continued operations of the various agencies, boards, and commissions of state government. The recommendations shall be in bill form and introduced to the Legislature as recommendations of the chief administrative office of the state, based upon the financial records and knowledge of the specific problems as brought to the attention of the Department of Administrative Services.

(2) For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section and the implementation of Article III, section 22, of the Constitution of Nebraska, deficiency shall mean any decrease or increase in any fund source for any budget program for the biennium in progress.

Laws 1974, LB 1059, § 18;

Laws 1978, LB 526, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 50-423;

Laws 1986, LB 258, § 8.